Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE H. PUBLIC HEALTH PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 167. FEMALE GENITAL MUTILATION

Sec. 167.001. FEMALE GENITAL MUTILATION PROHIBITED. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) knowingly circumcises, excises, or infibulates any part of the labia majora or labia minora or clitoris of another person who is younger than 18 years of age;

(2) is a parent or legal guardian of another person who is younger than 18 years of age and knowingly consents to or permits an act described by Subdivision (1) to be performed on that person; or

(3) knowingly transports or facilitates the transportation of another person who is younger than 18 years of age within this state or from this state for the purpose of having an act described by Subdivision (1) performed on that person.

(b) An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

(c) It is a defense to prosecution under Subsection (a) that:

(1) the person performing the act is a physician or other licensed health care professional and the act is within the scope of the person's license; and

(2) the act is performed for medical purposes.

(d) It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that:

(1) the person on whom the circumcision, excision, or infibulation was performed or was to be performed, or another person authorized to consent to medical treatment of that person, including that person's parent or legal guardian, consented to the circumcision, excision, or infibulation;

(2) the circumcision, excision, or infibulation is required by a custom or practice of a particular group; or

(3) the circumcision, excision, or infibulation was performed or was to be performed as part of or in connection with a religious or other ritual.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 642, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 166.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(75), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 537 (S.B. 323), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.